Georgia, session 2025_26, SB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 5B of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
State Accounting Office, is amended by revising Code Section 50-5B-3, relating to powers
and duties, as follows:
"50-5B-3.
(a) The state accounting officer shall:
(1) Prescribe state-wide accounting policies, procedures, and practices;
(2) Prescribe, develop, operate, and maintain uniform state accounting systems for all
state government organizations which facilitate financial accounting and reporting in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and also meet state and federal
accounting and financial reporting requirements;
S. B. 118
- 1 -

LC 47 3192
(3) Prescribe the manner in which disbursements shall be made by state government
organizations;
(4) Prescribe and supervise the installation of any changes in the state accounting
information systems necessary to secure and maintain internal control and facilitate the
recording of accounting data for the purpose of preparing reliable, timely, and meaningful
statements and reports;
(5) Manage the state's accounting, payroll, and human capital systems; provided,
however, that any such systems must allow for payroll deductions to any credit union
identified by a payee;
(6) Using generally accepted accounting principles, prepare the state's financial
statements and other reports in accordance with legal requirements;
(7) Provide annual financial statements and other reports to the state auditor and other
auditors, as appropriate, for review and certification when required by statute or federal
regulation;
(8) Develop interim reports on the financial condition and budgetary compliance of the
state and various state organizations;
(9) Determine the proper classification for accounting and reporting purposes of all
assets, liabilities, revenues, expenditures, fund balances, funds, and accounts in
compliance with legal requirements and generally accepted accounting principles and
prescribe a uniform classification of accounts and other accounting identifiers which shall
be used by all state organizations;
(10) Develop processes and systems to improve accountability and enhanced collection
of accounts receivable due to the state. In developing these processes, the state
accounting officer may prescribe procedures to allow for the recognition of uncollectible
accounts for financial reporting purposes. He or she may also develop guidelines to
allow uncollectible debts to be removed from active collection processes. This
S. B. 118
- 2 -

LC 47 3192
recognition shall not remove or diminish the state's claim on accounts or debt owed to the
state; and
(11) Develop processes and systems to improve accountability and enhance efficiency
for disbursement of funds and management of accounts payable.
(b) The state accounting officer may recommend processes and systems to improve the
cash management practices of the state to the State Depository Board. The state accounting
officer in cooperation with the Office of the State Treasurer may prescribe policies and
procedures to implement the policies of the board."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 118
- 3 -